District of Columbia statutes.
1-1061.20

Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This subchapter modifies, limits, or supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, approved June 30, 2000, (114 Stat. 464; 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq.) (“Act”), but does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101(c) of that Act (15 U.S.C. § 7001(c) ), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that Act (15 U.S.C. §  7003(b) ).

June 5, 2012, D.C. Law 19-137, § 120, 59 DCR 2542

History

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 20 of the Uniform Military and Overseas Voters Act.

Editor's Notes